District of Columbia statutes.
2-421

Right to present claim.

Any person unjustly convicted of and subsequently imprisoned for a criminal offense contained in the District of Columbia Official Code may present a claim for damages against the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-143, § 2, 27 DCR 4656

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-422.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1221.